Missouri, session 2026, HB2108.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section 1. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
2 grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
3 in property located in Cole County, Missouri, to the City of Jefferson. The property to
4 be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
5 TRACT DESCRIPTION:
6 A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 436 AND 437, CITY OF
7 JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT
8 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 339 OF THE COLE
9 COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS
10 FOLLOWS:
11 COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 436 OF THE
12 CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF
13 TRACT 2.70 AS DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF
14 THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE
15 OF SAID INLOT 436 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT 2.70, S
16 42°08’00" W, 12.68 FEET TO THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SAID TRACT
17 2.70, THE POINT OF BEGINNING:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

SCS HCS HB 2108 2
18 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
19 NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 436, AND WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE
20 OF TRACT 2.70 AS DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF
21 THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS, WITH A CURVE TO THE RIGHT 2.31
22 FEET, CURVE RADIUS 13.83 FEET, CHORD S 53°30’25" E, 2.31 FEET;
23 THENCE S 48°42’49" E, 103.75 FEET TO THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF
24 SAID TRACT 2.70, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF THE
25 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 123 PAGE 284 OF THE
26 COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF
27 SAID TRACT, S 59°09’35" E, 17.29 FEET; THENCE S 48°39’20" E, 33.54
28 FEET TO THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SAID TRACT, ALSO BEING THE
29 SOUTHWEST CORNER OF TRACT 2.60 AS DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN
30 BOOK 121 PAGE 353; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID
31 TRACT S 48°41’47" E, 41.38 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE SOUTHWEST
32 LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 41°38’16" W, 10.46 FEET; THENCE N 48°04’58" W,
33 70.28 FEET; THENCE WITH A CURVE TO THE LEFT 99.14 FEET, CURVE
34 RADIUS 89.00 FEET, CHORD N 79°59’40" W, 94.09 FEET; THENCE S 68°
35 05’37" W, 58.04 FEET; THENCE N 21°54’23" W, 4.43 FEET; THENCE S 68°
36 05’37" W, 42.59 FEET TO A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT
37 436, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT
38 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 339 OF THE COLE
39 COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
40 INLOT 436 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°08’00" E,
41 143.09 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.16 ACRES
42 MORE OR LESS.
43 TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
44 A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOTS 436 THRU 440, CITY OF JEFFERSON,
45 COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED
46 BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 339 OF THE COLE COUNTY
47 RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
48 COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 436 OF THE
49 CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF
50 TRACT 2.70 AS DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF
51 THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE
52 OF SAID INLOT 436 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT 2.70, S
53 42°08’00" W, 12.68 FEET TO THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SAID TRACT

SCS HCS HB 2108 3
54 2.70; THENCE CONTINUING WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
55 INLOT 436, S 42°08’00" W, 143.09 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING:
56 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
57 NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 436, N 68°05’37" E, 42.59 FEET; THENCE
58 S 21°54’23" W, 4.43 FEET; THENCE N 68°05’37" E, 58.04 FEET; THENCE
59 WITH A CURVE TO THE RIGHT 99.14 FEET, CURVE RADIUS 89.00 FEET,
60 CHORD S 79°59’40" E, 94.09 FEET; THENCE S 48°04’58" E, 70.28 FEET;
61 THENCE N 41°38’16" E, 10.46 FEET TO A POINT ON THE SOUTHWEST
62 LINE OF TRACT 2.60 AS DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE
63 353 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
64 SOUTHWEST LINE OF TRACTS 2.60, 2.50, 2.40, AND 2.30 AS
65 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE
66 COUNTY RECORDS, S 48°41’51" E, 135.07 FEET; THENCE S 53°55’14" E,
67 61.87 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT OF 439,
68 ALSO BEING THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF TRACT 2.30 AS DESCRIBED
69 BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE COUNTY
70 RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 439, S
71 48°09’18" E, 22.95 TO THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF SAID INLOT 439;
72 THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 439, S 42°08’00"
73 W, 49.40 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID
74 INLOT 439, N 48°21’44" W, 277.24 FEET; THENCE S 86°54’06" W, 142.07
75 FEET; THENCE S 42°09’55" W, 266.70 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE
76 SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 440; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST
77 LINE OF INLOT 440, N 48°09’32" W, 40.00 TO THE SOUTHWEST CORNER
78 OF SAID INLOT 440; THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
79 INLOT 440, N 42°08’00" E, 261.67 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING
80 AND CONTAINS 0.70 ACRE MORE OR LESS.
81 TRACT DESCRIPTION:
82 A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 295 AND 296, CITY OF
83 JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT
84 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE
85 COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS
86 FOLLOWS:
87 BEGINNING AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 296 OF THE CITY
88 OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF THE
89 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE
90 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF

SCS HCS HB 2108 4
91 SAID INLOT 295 AND INLOT 296, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHWEST LINE
92 OF SAID TRACT, N 47°42’52" W, 208.34 FEET TO THE SOUTHWEST
93 CORNER OF INLOT 295, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF
94 SAID TRACT; THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 295,
95 AND WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°05’08" E, 56.27
96 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 295
97 AND SAID TRACT, S 48°11’21" E, 149.10 FEET; THENCE S 57°43’36" E,
98 60.32 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 296, ALSO
99 BEING A POINT ON THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED
100 BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE COUNTY
101 RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 296
102 AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 42°14’53" W, 68.00 FEET
103 TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.28 ACRES MORE OR
104 LESS.
105 TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
106 A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOTS 292, INLOT 295 AND INLOT 296, CITY
107 OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE
108 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE
109 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED
110 AS FOLLOWS:
111 COMMENCING AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 296 OF THE
112 CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF THE
113 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE
114 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF
115 SAID INLOT 296 AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°
116 14’53" E, 68.00 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING:
117 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
118 SOUTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 296, AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF
119 SAID TRACT, N 57°43’36" W, 60.32 FEET; THENCE N 48°11’21" W, 149.10
120 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 295, ALSO
121 BEING A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT; THENCE
122 WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 295 AND THE NORTHWEST
123 LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°05’08" E, 70.01 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE
124 NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 295 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
125 TRACT, S 48°11’45" E, 153.64 FEET; THENCE N 42°09’56" E, 290.35 FEET,
126 TO A POINT ON THE NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 292, ALSO BEING A
127 POINT ON THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT; THENCE WITH

SCS HCS HB 2108 5
128 THE NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 292 AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF
129 SAID TRACT, S 47°47’48" E, 55.48 FEET, TO THE NORTHEAST CORNER
130 OF INLOT 292, ALSO BEING THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF SAID
131 TRACT; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 292,
132 AND INLOT 296, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S
133 42°14’53" W, 350.02 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND
134 CONTAINS 0.70 ACRE MORE OR LESS.
135 TRACT DESCRIPTION:
136 A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOT 297, AND INLOT 301, CITY
137 OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE
138 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE
139 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED
140 AS FOLLOWS:
141 COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 297 OF THE
142 CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF THE
143 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE
144 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF
145 SAID INLOT 297 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 42°
146 14’53" W, 154.38 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING
147 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
148 NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 297, AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF
149 SAID TRACT, S 47°50’05" E, 19.74 FEET; THENCE S 42°09’56" W, 158.35
150 FEET; THENCE S 48°23’10" E, 72.95 FEET; THENCE S 41°36’50" W, 98.71
151 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT
152 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE
153 COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID
154 TRACT THE FOLLOWING COURSES: N 48°09’32" W, 78.99 FEET;
155 THENCE N 42°24’31" E, 32.97 FEET; THENCE N 64°34’23" W, 15.78 FEET,
156 TO A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 301, ALSO BEING A
157 POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
158 DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS;
159 THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 301 AND INLOT
160 297, ALSO BEING THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°14’53"
161 E, 228.38 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.27
162 ACRES MORE OR LESS.
163 TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:

SCS HCS HB 2108 6
164 A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOT 297, INLOT 301, INLOT 302, AND INLOT
165 303 CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF
166 THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE
167 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED
168 AS FOLLOWS:
169 BEGINNING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 297 OF THE
170 CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF THE
171 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE
172 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE OF
173 SAID INLOT 297 AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 48°
174 09’25" E, 79.52 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE NORTHEAST LINE OF
175 INLOT 297, AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 42°09’56" W,
176 275.23 FEET; THENCE S 48°23’09" E, 49.69 FEET; THENCE S 09°39’05" W,
177 150.87 FEET; THENCE S 41°36’50" W, 8.27 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE
178 SOUTH LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277
179 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
180 SOUTH LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 48°38’41" W, 32.24 FEET; THENCE N 48°
181 09’32" W, 84.73 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE SOUTH LINE OF SAID
182 TRACT, N 41°36’50" E, 98.71 FEET; THENCE N 48°23’10" W, 72.95 FEET;
183 THENCE N 42°09’56" E, 158.35 FEET; THENCE N 47°50’05" W, 19.74 FEET,
184 TO A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 297, ALSO BEING A
185 POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
186 DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS;
187 THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 297, AND THE
188 NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°14’53" E, 154.38 FEET TO THE
189 POINT OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.76 ACRE MORE OR LESS.
190 TRACT DESCRIPTION:
191 A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 431 AND 435, CITY OF
192 JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT
193 DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE
194 COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS
195 FOLLOWS:
196 BEGINNING AT THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 431 OF THE CITY
197 OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE
198 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE
199 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF
200 SAID INLOT 431 AND INLOT 435, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST LINE

SCS HCS HB 2108 7
201 OF SAID TRACT, S 42°08’00" W, 417.44 FEET TO THE SOUTHEAST
202 CORNER OF INLOT 435, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF
203 SAID TRACT; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 435,
204 AND WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 47°42’52" W, 28.00
205 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 435
206 AND SAID TRACT, N 41°53’46" E, 356.78 FEET; THENCE N 21°00’20" E,
207 44.38 FEET; THENCE N 18°15’25" W, 39.27 FEET TO A POINT ON THE
208 NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 431, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE
209 NORTHEAST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK
210 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
211 NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 431 AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF
212 SAID TRACT, S 47°42’52" E, 79.61 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING
213 AND CONTAINS 0.30 ACRES MORE OR LESS.
214 TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
215 A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOTS 428 THRU 431 AND INLOT 435, CITY
216 OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE
217 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE
218 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED
219 AS FOLLOWS:
220 COMMENCING AT THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 431 OF THE
221 CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE
222 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE
223 COLE COUNTY RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE OF
224 SAID INLOT 431 AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 47°
225 42’52" W, 79.61 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING:
226 THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
227 NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 431, AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF
228 SAID TRACT, S 18°15’25" E, 39.27 FEET; THENCE S 21°00’20" W, 44.38
229 FEET; THENCE S 41°53’46" W, 356.78 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE
230 SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 435, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE
231 SOUTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK
232 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
233 SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 435, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHWEST LINE
234 OF SAID TRACT, N 47°42’52" W, 38.00 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE
235 SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 435, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHWEST LINE
236 OF SAID TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF
237 THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS, N 42°09’55" E, 320.16 FEET; THENCE N

SCS HCS HB 2108 8
238 03°49’48" E, 97.35 FEET; THENCE N 48°11’21" W, 120.57 FEET; THENCE N
239 88°09’33" W, 223.89 FEET TO A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF
240 INLOT 428, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF THE
241 TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE
242 COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF
243 SAID INLOT 428, ALSO BEING THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
244 N 42°05’08" E, 167.29 FEET TO THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF SAID
245 INLOT 428 AND THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF SAID TRACT; THENCE
246 WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 428, 429, 430 AND 431,
247 ALSO BEING THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 47°42’52" E,
248 338.04 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.85 ACRE
249 MORE OR LESS.
250 2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
251 conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
252 include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
253 and terms of the conveyance.
254 3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 2. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell,
2 transfer, grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of
3 Missouri in property located in Nodaway County, Missouri. The property to be
4 conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
5 Tract 1
6 Beginning at the North Quarter Corner Section 13, Township 64 North, Range 36
7 West, Nodaway County, Missouri; thence along Section Line, South 86 degrees
8 48 minutes 14 seconds East 1557.37 feet; thence departing said line, South 03
9 degrees 05 minutes 47 seconds West 1037.56 feet; thence South 59 degrees 30
10 minutes 04 seconds East 503.01 feet; thence South 18 degrees 22 minutes 57
11 seconds West 282.59 feet; thence along the northern right-of-way of the former
12 Norfolk & Western Railroad the following courses and distances: South 89
13 degrees 57 minutes 27 seconds West 229.70 feet; thence 532.26 feet by arc
14 distance along a curve to the right having a radius of 3224.02 feet and a chord
15 bearing of North 85 degrees 20 minutes 37 seconds West 531.66 feet; thence
16 North 80 degrees 35 minutes 32 seconds West 1145.21 feet; thence departing said
17 right-of-way and along Quarter Section Line, North 01 degrees 52 minutes 08
18 seconds East 1416.90 feet to the point beginning.
19 Tract 2

SCS HCS HB 2108 9
20 Commencing at the North Quarter Corner Section 13, Township 64 North,
21 Range 36 West, Nodaway County, Missouri; thence along Quarter Section Line,
22 South 01 degrees 52 minutes 08 seconds West 1416.90 feet to the Point of
23 Beginning; thence continuing along Quarter Section Line, South 01 degrees 52
24 minutes 08 seconds West 50.44 feet; thence along the centerline of the former
25 Norfolk & Western Railroad the following courses and distances: South 80
26 degrees 35 minutes 32 seconds East 1138.61 feet; thence 540.49 feet by arc
27 distance along a curve to the left having a radius of 3274.02 feet and a chord
28 bearing of South 85 degrees 20 minutes 36 seconds East 539.87 feet; thence North
29 89 degrees 57 minutes 27 seconds East 213.04 feet; thence departing said
30 centerline, North 18 degrees 22 minutes 57 seconds East 52.70 feet; thence along
31 the northern right-of-way of the former Norfolk & Western Railroad the
32 following courses and distances: South 89 degrees 57 minutes 27 seconds West
33 229.70 feet; thence 532.26 feet by arc distance along a curve to the right having a
34 radius of 3224.02 feet and a chord bearing of North 85 degrees 20 minutes 37
35 seconds West 531.66 feet; thence North 80 degrees 35 minutes 32 seconds West
36 1145.21 feet; to the point of beginning.
37 2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
38 conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
39 include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
40 and terms of the conveyance.
41 3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 3. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
2 grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
3 in property located in the City of Jefferson, Cole County, Missouri. The property to be
4 conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
5 PART OF THE WEST HALF OF THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF
6 SECTION 34, TOWNSHIP 45 NORTH, RANGE 12 WEST, IN THE CITY
7 OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, MORE PARTICULARLY
8 DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
9 FROM THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE WEST HALF OF THE
10 SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SAID SECTION 34; THENCE SOUTH 05
11 DEGREES 46 MINUTES 13 SECONDS EAST ALONG THE EAST LINE OF
12 THE WEST HALF OF THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SAID SECTION 34
13 AND THE WEST LINE OF RIVERVIEW CEMETERY, 2222.85 FEET TO
14 THE POINT OF BEGINNING FOR THIS DESCRIPTION; THENCE
15 CONTINUING SOUTH 05 DEGREES 46 MINUTES 13 SECONDS EAST

SCS HCS HB 2108 10
16 ALONG SAID WEST LINE OF RIVERVIEW CEMETERY AND THE EAST
17 LINE OF THE WEST HALF OF THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SECTION
18 34, 400.12 FEET TO THE NORTHERLY LINE OF WEST MAIN STREET;
19 THENCE WESTERLY ALONG THE NORTHERLY LINE OF SAID WEST
20 MAIN STREET, ON A CURVE TO THE LEFT, HAVING A RADIUS OF
21 1940.08 FEET, A DISTANCE OF 226.85 FEET; THENCE SOUTH 82
22 DEGREES 25 MINUTES 40 SECONDS WEST ALONG THE NORTH LINE
23 OF SAID WEST MAIN STREET, 73.40 FEET TO THE EAST LINE OF
24 HOOVER ROAD; THENCE NORTH 05 DEGREES 46 MINUTES 13
25 SECONDS WEST ALONG THE EAST LINE OF HOOVER ROAD, 396.31
26 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE EAST LINE OF HOOVER ROAD, NORTH
27 84 DEGREES 13 MINUTES 47 SECONDS EAST, 300.00 FEET TO THE
28 POINT OF BEGINNING.
29 2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
30 sale, transfer, grant, conveyance, or release as the commissioner deems reasonable.
31 Such terms and conditions may include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals
32 required and the time, place, and terms of the sale, transfer, grant, conveyance, or
33 release.
34 3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
✔